Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.100

Ambulance service authorized—Restriction.

The legislative authority of any county may by appropriate legislation provide for the establishment of a system of ambulance service for the entire county or for portions thereof, and award contracts for ambulance service: PROVIDED, That such legislation may not provide for the establishment of any system which would compete with any existing private system.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 89 s 1.]